Tennessee, session 114, SB2261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 48, Chapter 101, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
48-101-401.
As used in this part:
(1) "Employee" means a person who performs services for an employer
for wages that are subject to withholding requirements under 26 U.S.C. § 3402;
(2) "Nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit entity that is tax exempt
under United States Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3));
(3) "Person" means an individual or entity; and
(4) "Salary" means a fixed, regular payment, typically paid on a monthly
or biweekly basis, often expressed as an annual sum, made by a nonprofit
organization to an employee of the organization.
48-101-402.
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a nonprofit organization that
operates in this state and receives state or federal grants shall compile, maintain, and
publish in a publicly available location the salary of each employee of the nonprofit
organization. If the nonprofit organization has a publicly accessible website, the
information required under this subsection (a) must be published on the website in a
publicly accessible location.
SB2261
011347
- 1 -

(b) A nonprofit organization subject to the requirements of subsection (a) shall
update the information no less than once every six (6) months.
48-101-403.
A person that believes that a nonprofit organization has violated § 47-101-402
may bring a cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction. A court that finds that
the nonprofit organization violated § 47-101-402 may order declaratory or injunctive
relief, and shall award reasonable court costs and attorney fees to the prevailing party.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011347